Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.400

Deposit of moneys from chapter.

All moneys, except fines and penalties, received or collected under the terms of this chapter must be deposited into the construction registration inspection account. All fines and penalties received or collected under the terms of this chapter shall be deposited in the homeowner recovery account under RCW 18.27.420.

[ 2023 c 213 s 5; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 11 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 213 ss 3-9: See note following RCW 18.27.040.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 51.44.190.